Hawaii statutes.
§560:2-517 Penalty clause for
contest. A provision in a will purporting to penalize an interested person
for contesting the will or instituting other proceedings relating to the estate
is unenforceable if probable cause exists for instituting proceedings. [L 1996,
c 288, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next